Florida, session 2026, SB1380.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 122 123 Section 1.âSection 17.72, Florida Statutes, is created to 124 read: 125 17.72âProhibition on licensing and certification of 126 unauthorized aliens.â 127 (1)âThe department may not issue a license or certification 128 to any person who is an unauthorized alien as defined in s. 129 908.111(1). 130 (2)âThe department shall adopt rules to establish criteria 131 for verifying compliance with subsection (1) before issuing any 132 license or certificate. 133 Section 2.âParagraph (c) of subsection (5) of section 134 125.0167, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 135 125.0167âDiscretionary surtax on documents; adoption; 136 application of revenue.â 137 (5) 138 (c)âA county may not impose any requirement as a condition 139 to receiving any financial assistance on a borrower other than 140 requiring proof that the borrower is lawfully present in the 141 United States and that the borrowerâs income does not exceed 140 142 percent of the area median income. In addition to the income 143 eligibility requirement, borrowers may only be subject to loan 144 qualifications of lenders licensed to provide mortgage financing 145 as to the amount of the loan. A county may not create 146 requirements that restrict participation by eligible borrowers. 147 Section 3.âSection 284.52, Florida Statutes, is created to 148 read: 149 284.52âDenial of claims.â 150 (1)âAs used in this section, the term: 151 (a)ââAdultâ has the same meaning as in s. 847.001. 152 (b)ââMinorâ has the same meaning as in s. 847.001. 153 (c)ââUnauthorized alienâ has the same meaning as in s. 154 908.111. 155 (2)âThe Division of Risk Management may approve or deny 156 claims relating to an unauthorized alien who is a minor; 157 however, the division may not approve a claim submitted by an 158 unauthorized alien who is an adult or by a person who fails to 159 provide lawful documentation of citizenship to the division as 160 required by state and federal law. 161 Section 4.âPresent subsection (5) of section 322.53, 162 Florida Statutes, is redesignated as subsection (6), and a new 163 subsection (5) is added to that section, to read: 164 322.53âLicense required; exemptions.â 165 (5)âAll licensing procedures, prelicensing instruction, and 166 licensing testing under this chapter must be conducted in 167 English. The use of interpreters, translators, translations, or 168 alternate language accommodations is prohibited. 169 Section 5.âSection 420.56, Florida Statutes, is created to 170 read: 171 420.56âDown payment assistance for unauthorized aliens 172 prohibited.â 173 (1)âAs used in this section, the term: 174 (a)ââDown payment assistanceâ includes, but is not limited 175 to, grants to assist a person in the purchase of a residential 176 property which take the form of a loan or a silent second 177 mortgage. 178 (b)ââSilent second mortgageâ means a second mortgage used 179 to secure funds for a down payment for a residential property 180 which is not disclosed to the original mortgage lender before 181 closing occurs. 182 (c)ââUnauthorized alienâ has the same meaning as in s. 183 908.111. 184 (2)âState and local governmental entities, the corporation, 185 and private corporations, including nonprofit organizations 186 incorporated under chapter 617, participating in down payment 187 assistance programs or silent second mortgage programs may not 188 provide any form of down payment assistance to a person who is 189 an unauthorized alien. 190 (3)âIf an unauthorized alien is discovered to have received 191 down payment assistance from a state or local governmental 192 entity, the corporation, or a private corporation, the 193 unauthorized alien must immediately repay the down payment 194 assistance to the appropriate entity or corporation. If the 195 unauthorized alien does not repay the down payment assistance, 196 the state or local governmental entity, the corporation, or the 197 private corporation must initiate foreclosure proceedings under 198 chapter 702 against the unauthorized alien. 199 Section 6.âSection 420.5088, Florida Statutes, is amended 200 to read: 201 420.5088âFlorida Homeownership Assistance Program.âThere is 202 created The Florida Homeownership Assistance Program is created 203 for the purpose of assisting low-income and moderate-income 204 persons who are lawfully present in the United States in 205 purchasing a home as their primary residence by reducing the 206 cost of the home with below-market construction financing, by 207 reducing the amount of down payment and closing costs paid by 208 the borrower to a maximum of 5 percent of the purchase price, or 209 by reducing the monthly payment to an affordable amount for the 210 borrower purchaser. Loans must shall be made available at an 211 interest rate that does not exceed 3 percent. The balance of any 212 loan is due at closing if the property is sold, refinanced, 213 rented, or transferred, unless otherwise approved by the 214 corporation. 215 (1)âFor loans made available pursuant to s. 216 420.507(23)(a)1. or 2.: 217 (a)âThe corporation may underwrite and make those mortgage 218 loans through the program to persons or families who are 219 lawfully present in the United States and have incomes that do 220 not exceed 120 percent of the state or local median income, 221 whichever is greater, adjusted for family size. 222 (b)âLoans must shall be made available for the term of the 223 first mortgage. 224 (c)âLoans may not exceed the lesser of 35 percent of the 225 purchase price of the home or the amount necessary to enable the 226 borrower purchaser to meet credit underwriting criteria. 227 (2)âFor loans made pursuant to s. 420.507(23)(a)3.: 228 (a)âAvailability is limited to nonprofit sponsors or 229 developers who are selected for program participation pursuant 230 to this subsection. 231 (b)âPreference must be given to community-based 232 organizations as defined in s. 420.503. 233 (c)âPriority must be given to projects that have received 234 state assistance in funding project predevelopment costs. 235 (d)âThe benefits of making such loans must shall be 236 contractually provided to the persons or families purchasing 237 homes financed under this subsection. 238 (e)âAt least 30 percent of the units in a project financed 239 pursuant to this subsection must be sold to persons or families 240 who are lawfully present in the United States and who have 241 incomes that do not exceed 80 percent of the state or local 242 median income, whichever amount is greater, adjusted for family 243 size; and at least another 30 percent of the units in a project 244 financed pursuant to this subsection must be sold to persons or 245 families who are lawfully present in the United States and who 246 have incomes that do not exceed 65 percent of the state or local 247 median income, whichever amount is greater, adjusted for family 248 size. 249 (f)âThe maximum loan amount may not exceed 33 percent of 250 the total project cost. 251 (g)âA person who is lawfully present in the United States 252 and purchases a home in a project financed under this subsection 253 is eligible for a loan authorized by s. 420.507(23)(a)1. or 2. 254 in an aggregate amount not exceeding the construction loan made 255 pursuant to this subsection. The home purchaser must meet all 256 the requirements for loan recipients established pursuant to the 257 applicable loan program. 258 (h)âThe corporation shall provide, by rule, for the 259 establishment of a review committee composed of corporation 260 staff and shall establish, by rule, a scoring system for 261 evaluating and ranking applications submitted for construction 262 loans under this subsection, including, but not limited to, the 263 following criteria: 264 1.âThe affordability of the housing proposed to be built. 265 2.âThe direct benefits of the assistance to the persons who 266 will reside in the proposed housing. 267 3.âThe demonstrated capacity of the applicant to carry out 268 the proposal, including the experience of the development team. 269 4.âThe economic feasibility of the proposal. 270 5.âThe extent to which the applicant demonstrates potential 271 cost savings by combining the benefits of different governmental 272 programs and private initiatives, including the local government 273 contributions and local government comprehensive planning and 274 activities that promote affordable housing. 275 6.âThe use of the least amount of program loan funds 276 compared to overall project cost. 277 7.âThe provision of homeownership counseling. 278 8.âThe applicantâs agreement to exceed the requirements of 279 paragraph (e). 280 9.âThe commitment of first mortgage financing for the 281 balance of the construction loan and for the permanent loans to 282 the purchasers of the housing. 283 10.âThe applicantâs ability to proceed with construction. 284 11.âThe targeting objectives of the corporation which will 285 ensure an equitable distribution of loans between rural and 286 urban areas. 287 12.âThe extent to which the proposal will further the 288 purposes of this program. 289 (i)âThe corporation may reject any and all applications. 290 (j)âThe review committee established by corporation rule 291 pursuant to this subsection shall make recommendations to the 292 corporation board regarding program participation under this 293 subsection. The corporation board shall make the final ranking 294 for participation based on the scores received in the ranking, 295 further review of the applications, and the recommendations of 296 the review committee. The corporation board shall approve or 297 reject applicants for loans and shall determine the tentative 298 loan amount available to each program participant. The final 299 loan amount shall be determined pursuant to rule adopted under 300 s. 420.507(23)(h). 301 (3)âThe corporation shall publish a notice of fund 302 availability in a publication of general circulation throughout 303 this the state at least 60 days before prior to the anticipated 304 availability of funds. 305 (4)âThere is authorized to be established by The 306 corporation may establish with a qualified public depository 307 meeting the requirements of chapter 280 the Florida 308 Homeownership Assistance Fund to be administered by the 309 corporation according to the provisions of this program. Any 310 amounts held in the Florida Homeownership Assistance Trust Fund 311 for such purposes as of January 1, 1998, must be transferred to 312 the corporation for deposit in the Florida Homeownership 313 Assistance Fund, whereupon the Florida Homeownership Assistance 314 Trust Fund must be closed. There shall be deposited in the fund 315 moneys from the State Housing Trust Fund created by s. 420.0005, 316 or moneys received from any other source, for the purpose of 317 this program and all proceeds derived from the use of such 318 moneys. In addition, all unencumbered funds, loan repayments, 319 proceeds from the sale of any property, and any other proceeds 320 that would otherwise accrue pursuant to the activities of the 321 programs described in this section shall be transferred to this 322 fund. In addition, all loan repayments, proceeds from the sale 323 of any property, and any other proceeds that would otherwise 324 accrue pursuant to the activities conducted under the provisions 325 of the Florida Homeownership Assistance Program shall be 326 deposited in the fund and may shall not revert to the General 327 Revenue Fund. Expenditures from the Florida Homeownership 328 Assistance Fund are shall not be required to be included in the 329 corporationâs budget request or be subject to appropriation by 330 the Legislature. 331 (5)âNo more than one-fifth of the funds available in the 332 Florida Homeownership Assistance Fund may be made available to 333 provide loan loss insurance reserve funds to facilitate 334 homeownership for eligible persons. 335 Section 7.âSubsections (2) and (3) of section 420.5096, 336 Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 337 420.5096âFlorida Hometown Hero Program.â 338 (2)âThe Florida Hometown Hero Program is created to assist 339 Floridaâs hometown workforce in attaining homeownership by 340 providing financial assistance to residents to purchase a home 341 as their primary residence. Under the program, a borrower who is 342 lawfully present in the United States may apply to the 343 corporation for a loan to reduce the amount of the down payment 344 and closing costs paid by the borrower by a minimum of $10,000 345 and up to 5 percent of the first mortgage loan, not exceeding 346 $35,000. Loans must be made available at a zero percent interest 347 rate and must be made available for the term of the first 348 mortgage. The balance of any loan is due at closing if the 349 property is sold, refinanced, rented, or transferred, unless 350 otherwise approved by the corporation. 351 (3)âFor loans made available pursuant to s. 352 420.507(23)(a)1. or 2., the corporation may underwrite and make 353 those mortgage loans through the program to persons or families 354 who are lawfully present in the United States and who have 355 household incomes that do not exceed 150 percent of the state 356 median income or local median income, whichever is greater. A 357 borrower must be seeking to purchase a home as a primary 358 residence; must be a first-time homebuyer, and a Florida 359 resident, and lawfully present in the United States; and must be 360 employed full-time by a Florida-based employer. The borrower 361 must provide documentation of full-time employment or full-time 362 status for self-employed individuals. The requirement to be a 363 first-time homebuyer does not apply to a borrower who is an 364 active duty servicemember of a branch of the armed forces or the 365 Florida National Guard, as defined in s. 250.01, or a veteran. 366 Section 8.âSubsection (18) of section 440.02, Florida 367 Statutes, is amended to read: 368 440.02âDefinitions.âWhen used in this chapter, unless the 369 context clearly requires otherwise, the following terms shall 370 have the following meanings: 371 (18)(a)ââEmployeeâ means any person who receives 372 remuneration from an employer for the performance of any work or 373 service while engaged in any employment under any appointment or 374 contract for hire or apprenticeship, express or implied, oral or 375 written, whether lawfully or unlawfully employed, and includes, 376 but is not limited to, aliens authorized for employment under 377 federal law and lawfully or unlawfully employed minors. 378 (b)ââEmployeeâ includes any person who is an officer of a 379 corporation and who performs services for remuneration for such 380 corporation within this state, whether or not such services are 381 continuous. 382 1.âAny officer of a corporation may elect to be exempt from 383 this chapter by filing notice of the election with the 384 department as provided in s. 440.05. 385 2.âAs to officers of a corporation who are engaged in the 386 construction industry, no more than three officers of a 387 corporation or of any group of affiliated corporations may elect 388 to be exempt from this chapter by filing a notice of the 389 election with the department as provided in s. 440.05. Officers 390 must be shareholders, each owning at least 10 percent of the 391 stock of such corporation and listed as an officer of such 392 corporation with the Division of Corporations of the Department 393 of State, in order to elect exemptions under this chapter. For 394 purposes of this subparagraph, the term âaffiliatedâ means and 395 includes one or more corporations or entities, any one of which 396 is a corporation engaged in the construction industry, under the 397 same or substantially the same control of a group of business 398 entities which are connected or associated so that one entity 399 controls or has the power to control each of the other business 400 entities. The term âaffiliatedâ includes, but is not limited to, 401 the officers, directors, executives, shareholders active in 402 management, employees, and agents of the affiliated corporation. 403 The ownership by one business entity of a controlling interest 404 in another business entity or a pooling of equipment or income 405 among business entities shall be prima facie evidence that one 406 business is affiliated with the other. 407 3.âAn officer of a corporation who elects to be exempt from 408 this chapter by filing a notice of the election with the 409 department as provided in s. 440.05 is not an employee. 410 411 Services are presumed to have been rendered to the corporation 412 if the officer is compensated by other than dividends upon 413 shares of stock of the corporation which the officer owns. 414 (c)ââEmployeeâ includes: 415 1.âA sole proprietor or a partner who is not engaged in the 416 construction industry, devotes full time to the proprietorship 417 or partnership, and elects to be included in the definition of 418 employee by filing notice thereof as provided in s. 440.05. 419 2.âAll persons who are being paid by a construction 420 contractor as a subcontractor, unless the subcontractor has 421 validly elected an exemption as permitted by this chapter, or 422 has otherwise secured the payment of compensation coverage as a 423 subcontractor, consistent with s. 440.10, for work performed by 424 or as a subcontractor. 425 3.âAn independent contractor working or performing services 426 in the construction industry. 427 4.âA sole proprietor who engages in the construction 428 industry and a partner or partnership that is engaged in the 429 construction industry. 430 (d)ââEmployeeâ does not include: 431 1.âAn independent contractor who is not engaged in the 432 construction industry. 433 a.âIn order to meet the definition of independent 434 contractor, at least four of the following criteria must be met: 435 (I)âThe independent contractor maintains a separate 436 business with his or her own work facility, truck, equipment, 437 materials, or similar accommodations; 438 (II)âThe independent contractor holds or has applied for a 439 federal employer identification number, unless the independent 440 contractor is a sole proprietor who is not required to obtain a 441 federal employer identification number under state or federal 442 regulations; 443 (III)âThe independent contractor receives compensation for 444 services rendered or work performed and such compensation is 445 paid to a business rather than to an individual; 446 (IV)âThe independent contractor holds one or more bank 447 accounts in the name of the business entity for purposes of 448 paying business expenses or other expenses related to services 449 rendered or work performed for compensation; 450 (V)âThe independent contractor performs work or is able to 451 perform work for any entity in addition to or besides the 452 employer at his or her own election without the necessity of 453 completing an employment application or process; or 454 (VI)âThe independent contractor receives compensation for 455 work or services rendered on a competitive-bid basis or 456 completion of a task or a set of tasks as defined by a 457 contractual agreement, unless such contractual agreement 458 expressly states that an employment relationship exists. 459 b.âIf four of the criteria listed in sub-subparagraph a. do 460 not exist, an individual may still be presumed to be an 461 independent contractor and not an employee based on full 462 consideration of the nature of the individual situation with 463 regard to satisfying any of the following conditions: 464 (I)âThe independent contractor performs or agrees to 465 perform specific services or work for a specific amount of money 466 and controls the means of performing the services or work. 467 (II)âThe independent contractor incurs the principal 468 expenses related to the service or work that he or she performs 469 or agrees to perform. 470 (III)âThe independent contractor is responsible for the 471 satisfactory completion of the work or services that he or she 472 performs or agrees to perform. 473 (IV)âThe independent contractor receives compensation for 474 work or services performed for a commission or on a per-job 475 basis and not on any other basis. 476 (V)âThe independent contractor may realize a profit or 477 suffer a loss in connection with performing work or services. 478 (VI)âThe independent contractor has continuing or recurring 479 business liabilities or obligations. 480 (VII)âThe success or failure of the independent 481 contractorâs business depends on the relationship of business 482 receipts to expenditures. 483 c.âNotwithstanding anything to the contrary in this 484 subparagraph, an individual claiming to be an independent 485 contractor has the burden of proving that he or she is an 486 independent contractor for purposes of this chapter. 487 2.âA real estate licensee, if that person agrees, in 488 writing, to perform for remuneration solely by way of 489 commission. 490 3.âBands, orchestras, and musical and theatrical 491 performers, including disk jockeys, performing in licensed 492 premises as defined in chapter 562, if a written contract 493 evidencing an independent contractor relationship is entered 494 into before the commencement of such entertainment. 495 4.âAn owner-operator of a motor vehicle who transports 496 property under a written contract with a motor carrier which 497 evidences a relationship by which the owner-operator assumes the 498 responsibility of an employer for the performance of the 499 contract, if the owner-operator is required to furnish motor 500 vehicle equipment as identified in the written contract and the 501 principal costs incidental to the performance of the contract, 502 including, but not limited to, fuel and repairs, provided a 503 motor carrierâs advance of costs to the owner-operator when a 504 written contract evidences the owner-operatorâs obligation to 505 reimburse such advance shall be treated as the owner-operator 506 furnishing such cost and the owner-operator is not paid by the 507 hour or on some other time-measured basis. 508 5.âA person whose employment is both casual and not in the 509 course of the trade, business, profession, or occupation of the 510 employer. 511 6.âA volunteer, except a volunteer worker for the state or 512 a county, municipality, or other governmental entity. A person 513 who does not receive monetary remuneration for services is 514 presumed to be a volunteer unless there is substantial evidence 515 that a valuable consideration was intended by both employer and 516 employee. For purposes of this chapter, the term âvolunteerâ 517 includes, but is not limited to: 518 a.âPersons who serve in private nonprofit agencies and who 519 receive no compensation other than expenses in an amount less 520 than or equivalent to the standard mileage and per diem expenses 521 provided to salaried employees in the same agency or, if such 522 agency does not have salaried employees who receive mileage and 523 per diem, then such volunteers who receive no compensation other 524 than expenses in an amount less than or equivalent to the 525 customary mileage and per diem paid to salaried workers in the 526 community as determined by the department; and 527 b.âVolunteers participating in federal programs established 528 under Pub. L. No. 93-113. 529 7.âUnless otherwise prohibited by this chapter, any officer 530 of a corporation who elects to be exempt from this chapter. Such 531 officer is not an employee for any reason under this chapter 532 until the notice of revocation of election filed pursuant to s. 533 440.05 is effective. 534 8.âAn officer of a corporation that is engaged in the 535 construction industry who elects to be exempt from the 536 provisions of this chapter, as otherwise permitted by this 537 chapter. Such officer is not an employee for any reason until 538 the notice of revocation of election filed pursuant to s. 440.05 539 is effective. 540 9.âAn exercise rider who does not work for a single horse 541 farm or breeder, and who is compensated for riding on a case-by 542 case basis, provided a written contract is entered into prior to 543 the commencement of such activity which evidences that an 544 employee/employer relationship does not exist. 545 10.âA taxicab, limousine, or other passenger vehicle-for 546 hire driver who operates said vehicles pursuant to a written 547 agreement with a company which provides any dispatch, marketing, 548 insurance, communications, or other services under which the 549 driver and any fees or charges paid by the driver to the company 550 for such services are not conditioned upon, or expressed as a 551 proportion of, fare revenues. 552 11.âA person who performs services as a sports official for 553 an entity sponsoring an interscholastic sports event or for a 554 public entity or private, nonprofit organization that sponsors 555 an amateur sports event. For purposes of this subparagraph, such 556 a person is an independent contractor. For purposes of this 557 subparagraph, the term âsports officialâ means any person who is 558 a neutral participant in a sports event, including, but not 559 limited to, umpires, referees, judges, linespersons, 560 scorekeepers, or timekeepers. This subparagraph does not apply 561 to any person employed by a district school board who serves as 562 a sports official as required by the employing school board or 563 who serves as a sports official as part of his or her 564 responsibilities during normal school hours. 565 12.âMedicaid-enrolled clients under chapter 393 who are 566 excluded from the definition of employment under s. 567 443.1216(4)(d) and served by Adult Day Training Services under 568 the Home and Community-Based or the Family and Supported Living 569 Medicaid Waiver program in a sheltered workshop setting licensed 570 by the United States Department of Labor for the purpose of 571 training and earning less than the federal hourly minimum wage. 572 13.âMedicaid-enrolled clients under chapter 393 who are 573 excluded from the definition of employment under s. 574 443.1216(4)(d) and served by Adult Day Training Services under 575 the Family and Supported Living Medicaid Waiver program in a 576 sheltered workshop setting licensed by the United States 577 Department of Labor for the purpose of training and earning less 578 than the federal hourly minimum wage. 579 14.âAn unauthorized alien as defined in s. 908.111. 580 Section 9.âSubsection (2) of section 440.10, Florida 581 Statutes, is amended to read: 582 440.10âLiability for compensation.â 583 (2)âCompensation shall be payable irrespective of fault as 584 a cause for the injury, except as provided in ss. 440.09(3) and 585 440.1001 s. 440.09(3). 586 Section 10.âSection 440.1001, Florida Statutes, is created 587 to read: 588 440.1001âEmployer liability for injuries to unauthorized 589 aliens.â 590 (1)âAs used in this section, the term âunauthorized alienâ 591 has the same meaning as in s. 908.111. 592 (2)âAn employer who knowingly hires or employs an 593 individual who is not authorized to work in the United States 594 under federal law is personally and fully liable for all medical 595 and treatment costs and related expenses resulting from an 596 injury sustained by the unauthorized alien during his or her 597 employment. 598 (3)âAn employer may not transfer or otherwise shift 599 financial responsibility for medical and treatment costs and 600 related expenses resulting from an injury to any third party, 601 including an insurance company, a state agency, or any other 602 entity. 603 (4)âAn employer who violates this section is subject to the 604 following penalties: 605 (a)âA fine not to exceed $50,000 per violation. Fines 606 collected under this paragraph must be deposited into the 607 Workersâ Compensation Administration Trust Fund. 608 (b)âReimbursement of any public funds expended to provide 609 medical care to the unauthorized alien. 610 (c)âRevocation of the employerâs business license, 611 registration, or certification issued by the appropriate 612 licensing authority. 613 (5)âThe department shall transfer reported violations of 614 this section to the appropriate licensing authority for 615 enforcement. 616 Section 11.âSection 440.1002, Florida Statutes, is created 617 to read: 618 440.1002âEmployment eligibility for purposes of workersâ 619 compensation eligibility.â 620 (1)âAs used in this section, the term âE-Verify systemâ has 621 the same meaning as in s. 448.095(1). 622 (2)âBefore an employer may submit a claim for workersâ 623 compensation benefits for an employee, the employer must first 624 verify the employeeâs employment eligibility through the E 625 Verify system. 626 (3)âIf an employer fails to check an employeeâs employment 627 eligibility through the E-Verify system before submitting a 628 claim for workersâ compensation benefits, the employer is: 629 (a)âIneligible to receive indemnity or medical coverage 630 from the employerâs workersâ compensation insurance provider for 631 injuries sustained by that employee. 632 (b)âPersonally liable for all costs, expenses, and benefits 633 that would have otherwise been covered under this chapter. 634 (4)âAn employer shall retain a copy of the documentation 635 provided and any verification generated, if applicable, by the 636 E-Verify system for each employee. The employer must provide 637 such documentation or verification to the department or insurer 638 upon request. 639 (5)âThis section may not be construed to bestow any 640 employment rights or legal status on an employee who is verified 641 through the E-Verify system. 642 (6)âThe department may adopt rules to implement and enforce 643 this section. 644 Section 12.âPresent subsection (5) of section 448.09, 645 Florida Statutes, is redesignated as subsection (9), new 646 subsections (4) through (8) are added to that section, and 647 subsections (3) and (4) of that section are amended, to read: 648 448.09âUnauthorized aliens; employment prohibited.â 649 (3)âFor an employer who knowingly violates a violation of 650 this section, the department shall suspend for 1 year all 651 licenses held by the employer which were issued by a licensing 652 agency under chapter 120 and impose a fine not to exceed $10,000 653 per violation. Fines collected under this subsection must be 654 deposited into the State Economic Enhancement and Development 655 Trust Fund. 656 (4)âFor an employer who knowingly violates this section a 657 second time, the department shall suspend for 5 years all 658 licenses held by the employer which were issued by a licensing 659 agency under chapter 120 and impose a fine not to exceed 660 $100,000 per violation. Fines collected under this subsection 661 must be deposited into the State Economic Enhancement and 662 Development Trust Fund. 663 (5)âFor an employer who knowingly violates this section a 664 third time, the department shall permanently revoke all licenses 665 held by the employer personally, as well as any licenses held by 666 the entity if the employer is a corporation, which were issued 667 by a licensing agency under chapter 120 and impose a fine not to 668 exceed $250,000 per violation. Fines collected under this 669 subsection must be deposited into the State Economic Enhancement 670 and Development Trust Fund. 671 (6)(a)âFor an employer who knowingly violates this section 672 and the actions of an unauthorized alien employee result in 673 injuries to another person, the department shall suspend for 5 674 years all licenses held by the employer which were issued by a 675 licensing agency under chapter 120 and impose a fine not to 676 exceed $100,000 per violation. 677 (b)âFor an employer who knowingly violates this section and 678 the actions of an unauthorized alien employee result in the 679 death of another person, the department shall permanently revoke 680 all licenses held by the employer which were issued by a 681 licensing agency under chapter 120 and impose a fine not to 682 exceed $500,000 per violation. 683 (c)âFines collected under this subsection must be deposited 684 into the State Economic Enhancement and Development Trust Fund. 685 (d)âThere is created a civil cause of action against an 686 employer who violates this section if such violation results in 687 injuries to or the death of another person. 688 (7)âAn employer who knowingly hires more than 50 689 unauthorized aliens commits a felony of the third degree, 690 punishable as provided in s. 775.082, s. 775.083, or s. 775.084, 691 and the department shall permanently revoke all licenses held by 692 the employer personally, as well as any licenses held by the 693 entity if the employer is a corporation, which were issued by a 694 licensing agency under chapter 120. 695 (8)âA person who is injured or the next of kin, as defined 696 in s. 744.102, of a person who is killed by the actions of an 697 unauthorized alien employee may bring a cause of action under 698 subsection (6) against the employer for damages for bodily 699 injury or death place the employer on probation for a 1-year 700 period and require that the employer report quarterly to the 701 department to demonstrate compliance with the requirements of 702 subsection (1) and s. 448.095. 703 (4)âAny violation of this section which takes place within 704 24 months after a previous violation constitutes grounds for the 705 suspension or revocation of all licenses issued by a licensing 706 agency subject to chapter 120. The department shall take the 707 following actions for a violation involving: 708 (a)âOne to ten unauthorized aliens, suspension of all 709 applicable licenses held by a private employer for up to 30 days 710 by the respective agencies that issued them. 711 (b)âEleven to fifty unauthorized aliens, suspension of all 712 applicable licenses held by a private employer for up to 60 days 713 by the respective agencies that issued them. 714 (c)âMore than fifty unauthorized aliens, revocation of all 715 applicable licenses held by a private employer by the respective 716 agencies that issued them. 717 Section 13.âParagraph (a) of subsection (3) of section 718 448.095, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 719 448.095âEmployment eligibility.â 720 (3)âENFORCEMENT.â 721 (a)âFor the purpose of enforcement of this section, any of 722 the following persons or entities may request, and an employer 723 must provide, copies of any documentation relied upon by the 724 employer for the verification of a new employeeâs employment 725 eligibility: 726 1.âThe Department of Law Enforcement; 727 2.âThe Attorney General; 728 3.âThe state attorney in the circuit in which the new 729 employee works; 730 4.âThe statewide prosecutor; 731 5.âThe Department of Financial Services; or 732 6.5.âThe Department of Commerce. 733 Section 14.âSubsection (7) is added to section 560.208, 734 Florida Statutes, to read: 735 560.208âConduct of business.âIn addition to the 736 requirements specified in s. 560.1401, a licensee under this 737 part: 738 (7)âMay not initiate a foreign remittance transfer unless 739 the licensee has verified that the sender is not an unauthorized 740 alien as defined in s. 908.111. 741 (a)âAs used in this subsection, the term âforeign 742 remittance transferâ means a remittance transfer as defined in 743 the Electronic Fund Transfer Act, 15 U.S.C. s. 1693o-1, as 744 amended, the recipient of which is located in any country other 745 than the United States. 746 (b)âThe commission shall adopt rules relating to acceptable 747 forms of documentation that a licensee must use to verify that 748 the sender of a foreign remittance transfer is not an 749 unauthorized alien. The licensee must provide confirmation of 750 verification on forms the commission prescribes. All required 751 forms must be submitted to the office by the 15th of the month 752 after the close of each calendar quarter. 753 (c)âA licensee who initiates a foreign remittance transfer 754 in violation of this subsection shall pay a penalty equal to 25 755 percent of the United States dollar amount transferred, 756 excluding any fees or charges imposed by the licensee. A 757 licensee must remit to the office the amount of any penalty 758 owed, along with any forms prescribed by the office, by the 15th 759 of the month after the close of each calendar quarter. 760 Notwithstanding ss. 252.3711 and 560.144, the office shall 761 deposit in the Regulatory Trust Fund the penalties collected 762 under this paragraph. Notwithstanding any other provision, the 763 penalty imposed in this paragraph is the only remedy for a 764 violation of this subsection and a licensee may not be subject 765 to any other penalty. 766 Section 15.âPresent paragraphs (i) and (j) of subsection 767 (1) of section 560.211, Florida Statutes, are redesignated as 768 paragraphs (j) and (k), respectively, and a new paragraph (i) is 769 added to that subsection, to read: 770 560.211âRequired records.â 771 (1)âIn addition to the record retention requirements under 772 s. 560.1105, each licensee under this part must make, keep, and 773 preserve the following books, accounts, records, and documents 774 for 5 years: 775 (i)âThe documentation used to verify that the sender of a 776 foreign remittance transfer, as defined in s. 560.208(7)(a), is 777 not an unauthorized alien, as defined in s. 908.111, and the 778 penalties paid to the office pursuant to s. 560.208(7)(c), 779 including the date and amount of each foreign remittance 780 transfer and the name, date of birth, and address of each 781 sender. 782 Section 16.âSection 560.2115, Florida Statutes, is created 783 to read: 784 560.2115âRequired records audit.â 785 (1)âAs used in this section, the term: 786 (a)ââForeign remittance transferâ has the same meaning as 787 in s. 560.208(7)(a). 788 (b)ââUnauthorized alienâ has the same meaning as in s. 789 908.111. 790 (2)âFor enforcement purposes, the office may at any time 791 request, and the licensee must provide, records of documentation 792 used to verify that the sender of a foreign remittance transfer 793 is not an unauthorized alien. 794 (3)(a)âA person who has a good faith belief that a licensee 795 is failing to comply with s. 560.208(7) may file a complaint 796 with the office. 797 (b)âUpon receipt of a valid complaint of a violation of s. 798 560.208(7), which is substantiated by evidence, the office must 799 notify the licensee of the complaint and the substantiating 800 evidence and the licensee must pay the penalty required under s. 801 560.208(7)(c). 802 (4)âBeginning July 1, 2026, the office shall conduct random 803 quarterly audits of licensees to ensure compliance with s. 804 560.208(7). During an audit, the licensee must produce to the 805 office records of documentation the licensee used to verify that 806 each sender of a foreign remittance transfer is not an 807 unauthorized alien. 808 (5)âFailure to comply with subsections (1)-(4) constitutes 809 grounds for the suspension of all licenses held by the licensee 810 which were issued by the office. 811 Section 17.âSubsection (2) of section 560.310, Florida 812 Statutes, is amended to read: 813 560.310âRecords of check cashers and foreign currency 814 exchangers.â 815 (2)âIf the payment instrument is exceeds $1,000 or more, 816 the following additional information must be maintained or 817 submitted: 818 (a)âCustomer files, as prescribed by rule, on all customers 819 who cash corporate payment instruments that are exceed $1,000 or 820 more. 821 (b)âA copy of the personal identification that bears a 822 photograph of the customer used as identification and presented 823 by the customer. Acceptable personal identification is limited 824 to a valid driver license; a state identification card issued by 825 any state of the United States or its territories or the 826 District of Columbia, and showing a photograph and signature; a 827 United States Government Resident Alien Identification Card; a 828 passport; or a United States Military identification card. The 829 following may not be used as a form of personal identification: 830 1.âA license or identification card issued exclusively to 831 an unauthorized alien or undocumented immigrant. 832 2.âA license or identification card that is substantially 833 the same as a license or identification card issued to a United 834 States citizen or resident or others lawfully present in the 835 United States but which has markings establishing that the 836 licenseholder did not present proof of his or her lawful 837 presence in the United States. 838 (c)âA thumbprint of the customer taken by the licensee when 839 the payment instrument is presented for negotiation or payment. 840 (d)âThe office shall, at a minimum, require licensees to 841 submit the following information to the check cashing database 842 or electronic log, before entering into each check cashing 843 transaction for each payment instrument being cashed, in such 844 format as required by rule: 845 1.âTransaction date. 846 2.âPayor name as displayed on the payment instrument. 847 3.âPayee name as displayed on the payment instrument. 848 4.âConductor name, if different from the payee name. 849 5.âAmount of the payment instrument. 850 6.âAmount of currency provided. 851 7.âType of payment instrument, which may include personal, 852 payroll, government, corporate, third-party, or another type of 853 instrument. 854 8.âAmount of the fee charged for cashing of the payment 855 instrument. 856 9.âBranch or location where the payment instrument was 857 accepted. 858 10.âThe type of identification and identification number 859 presented by the payee or conductor. 860 11.âPayeeâs workersâ compensation insurance policy number 861 or exemption certificate number, if the payee is a business. 862 12.âSuch additional information as required by rule. 863 864 For purposes of this subsection, multiple payment instruments 865 accepted from any one person on any given day which total $1,000 866 or more must be aggregated and reported in the check cashing 867 database or on the log. 868 Section 18.âSection 627.7408, Florida Statutes, is created 869 to read: 870 627.7408âPresumption of fault in motor vehicle accidents 871 involving unauthorized out-of-state drivers.â 872 (1)âAs used in this section, the term: 873 (a)ââInvalid out-of-state driver licenseâ means a driver 874 license deemed invalid under s. 322.033. 875 (b)ââUnauthorized out-of-state driverâ means a person 876 operating a vehicle who has an invalid out-of-state driver 877 license. 878 (2)âIf an unauthorized out-of-state driver is involved in a 879 motor vehicle accident in this state, there is a rebuttable 880 presumption that the unauthorized-out-of-state driver is at 881 fault for the accident for purposes of filing an insurance 882 claim. This presumption applies regardless of the unauthorized 883 out-of-state driverâs compliance with other traffic laws at the 884 time of the motor vehicle accident. 885 (3)âThe presumption under subsection (2) does not apply in 886 the following circumstances: 887 (a)âThe other driver involved in the motor vehicle accident 888 is in violation of s. 316.193(1) because he or she is found to 889 have been operating the motor vehicle while under the influence 890 of alcoholic beverages, any chemical substance under s. 877.111, 891 or any controlled substance under chapter 893. 892 (b)âThe other driver involved in the motor vehicle accident 893 is determined, by clear and convincing evidence, to be at 894 egregious fault because of, but not limited to, reckless driving 895 in violation of s. 316.192, leaving the scene of an accident in 896 violation of s. 316.027, or racing on highways in violation of 897 s. 316.191. 898 (4)âThe presumption established under subsection (2) may be 899 rebutted by clear and convincing evidence that the unauthorized 900 out-of-state driver was not at fault based on factors such as 901 witness statements, accident reconstruction, or video evidence 902 directly related to the circumstances of the motor vehicle 903 accident. 904 (5)âUpon investigation of a motor vehicle accident, a law 905 enforcement officer, as defined in s. 943.10(1), must verify 906 whether any person involved in the motor vehicle accident is an 907 unauthorized out-of-state driver or has an invalid out-of-state 908 driver license in violation of s. 322.033. If a driver is 909 determined to be in violation of s. 322.033 and he or she does 910 not qualify for an exemption under subsection (3), the law 911 enforcement officer must note the presumption of fault on the 912 Florida Traffic Crash Report, Long Form or short-form crash 913 report under s. 316.066, as applicable, and notify the 914 Department of Highway Safety and Motor Vehicles within 48 hours 915 after the accident. 916 (6)âInsurers licensed under chapter 624 must apply the 917 presumption under subsection (2) in processing claims and may 918 not pay benefits to or settle claims with an unauthorized out 919 of-state driver. Insurers must report any suspected 920 noncompliance or rebuttal attempts by the unauthorized out-of 921 state driver to the Office of Insurance Regulation within 30 922 days after the filing of an insurance claim. An insurer that 923 fails to comply with this subsection is subject to 924 administrative penalties under s. 624.4211. 925 (7)âIf an unauthorized out-of-state-driverâs insurer is a 926 foreign insurer as defined in s. 624.06(2) and not licensed in 927 this state under chapter 624, any party aggrieved by the 928 nonenforcement of this section may bring a civil action for 929 injunctive relief and the prevailing party is entitled to 930 reasonable attorney fees and costs. 931 (8)âThe Department of Highway Safety and Motor Vehicles and 932 the Office of Insurance Regulation shall adopt rules to 933 implement this section, including standardized verification 934 forms and procedures for interagency coordination. 935 (9)(a)âThis section applies to all insurance policies 936 issued or renewed on or after the effective date of this act and 937 to all motor vehicle accidents occurring on or after the 938 effective date of this act. 939 (b)âThis section may not be construed to interfere with or 940 limit a law enforcement officerâs authority delegated under a 941 287(g) agreement with United States Immigration and Customs 942 Enforcement. 943 Section 19.âSection 655.98, Florida Statutes, is created to 944 read: 945 655.98âProhibited forms of identification for state 946 chartered financial institutions.â 947 (1)âA state-chartered financial institution may not accept 948 any of the following as a form of identification for the purpose 949 of opening a deposit account, loan account, or safe deposit box 950 or to receive any other services from a state-chartered 951 financial institution: 952 (a)âA license or identification card issued exclusively to 953 an unauthorized alien or undocumented immigrant. 954 (b)âA license or identification card that is substantially 955 the same as a license or identification card issued to a United 956 States citizen or resident or others lawfully present in the 957 United States but which has markings establishing that the 958 licenseholder did not present proof of his or her lawful 959 presence in the United States. 960 (2)âThe Office of Financial Regulation shall adopt rules to 961 ensure compliance with, and to enforce, this section. 962 Section 20.âThe Division of Law Revision is directed to 963 replace the phrase âthe effective date of this actâ wherever it 964 occurs in this act with the date this act becomes a law. 965 Section 21.âThis act shall take effect upon becoming a law.